Maryland, session 2025, HB1264.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–209.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C) OF THIS SECTION, A STUDENT
ENROLLED AT A PUBLIC HIGH SCHOOL MAY SATISFY ONE CREDIT OF A
REQUIREMENT TO EARN MATHEMATICS CREDITS FOR GRADUATION BY
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1264*

HOUSE BILL 1264
COMPLETING A CREDIT IN AN ADVANCED PLACEMENT COMPUTER SCIENCE COURSE
OR AN EQUIVALENTLY RIGOROUS COLLEGE PREPARATORY COMPUTER SCIENCE OR
COMPUTER PROGRAMMING COURSE SELECTED BY THE COUNTY BOARD.
(B) IN ORDER FOR A COMPUTER SCIENCE OR COMPUTER PROGRAMMING
COURSE TO SATISFY AS ONE CREDIT IN MATHEMATICS UNDER THIS SECTION, A
STUDENT MUST ENROLL IN THE COURSE CONCURRENTLY WITH OR AFTER
COMPLETING ALGEBRA II.
(C) THE COUNTY BOARD SHALL CERTIFY TO THE DEPARTMENT THAT A
COURSE SELECTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION MAY COUNT TOWARD
THE MATHEMATICS GRADUATION REQUIREMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.